Washington statutes.
RCW 23.78.050

Members—Membership shares.

(1) The articles of incorporation or the bylaws shall establish qualifications and the method of acceptance and termination of members. No person may be accepted as a member unless employed by the employee cooperative on a full-time or part-time basis.

(2) An employee cooperative shall issue a class of voting stock designated as "membership shares." Each member shall own only one membership share, and only members may own these shares.

(3) Membership shares shall be issued for a fee as determined from time to time by the directors. RCW 23B.06.040 and 23B.06.200 do not apply to such membership shares.

Members of an employee cooperative shall have all the rights and responsibilities of stockholders of a corporation organized under Title 23B RCW, except as otherwise provided in this chapter.

[ 1991 c 72 s 11; 1987 c 457 s 6.]